Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS STATUE.new text end new text begin $235,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration to work in consultation with the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board to reinstall the previously displayed Christopher Columbus statue on the State Capitol Mall. new text end